New Jersey, session 221, S1052.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Within one year after the date of enactment of this section, the Department of Environmental Protection shall conduct, or cause to be conducted, a study concerning the use of alternative drinking water supply sources when perfluoroalkyl or polyfluoroalkyl substances exceed maximum contaminant levels.  As part of the study, the department shall consider the drinking water supply sources available to public community water systems in the State and identify alternative drinking water supplies that may be available for use by public community water systems to provide water to the customers of the system when an exceedance of a maximum contaminant level for a perfluoroalkyl or polyfluoroalkyl substance is discovered. b.  In conducting the study required pursuant to this section, the department shall solicit input from representatives of public community water systems, academic institutions, and environmental organizations with expertise, knowledge, or experience in issues related to the States water supplies, and may hold public hearings, at a time and place determined by the department, to receive input on the issue. c.  No later than one year after the date of enactment of this section, the department shall prepare and submit to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature a written report containing the findings and recommendations of the study conducted, or caused to be conducted, pursuant to this section, including any proposals for legislation or other appropriate legislative or regulatory action.  The department shall also make the study available on the departments Internet website. d.  In the event that the report required pursuant to subsection c. of  this section is not prepared and submitted to the Governor and the Legislature within one year after the date of enactment of this section, the Commissioner of Environmental Protection, or the commissioner's designee, shall appear before the committee of first reference in which this act was considered in each House, or before another standing reference committee in the General Assembly as may be determined by the Speaker of the General Assembly and in the Senate as may be determined by the President of the Senate, to explain why the report has not yet been prepared and the steps the department is taking to ensure the implementation of this act.  Thereafter, for such time as the report required pursuant to subsection c. of this section remains unprepared, the Speaker of the General Assembly shall have the authority to require the Commissioner of Environmental Protection to appear before any appropriate General Assembly standing reference committee to explain why this act has not been implemented in accordance with its provisions and the steps that are being taken to ensure the implementation of this act, and the President of the Senate shall have the authority to require the Commissioner of Environmental Protection to appear before any appropriate Senate standing reference committee to explain why this act has not been implemented in accordance with its provisions and the steps that are being taken to ensure the implementation of this act. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately, and shall expire 30 days after the submittal of the report required pursuant to subsection c. of section 1 of this act.